test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-luoikkad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - luoikkâđ: # ML checked


    luoikkâđ+V+Inf: luoikkâđ
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: luoikkuđ

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoikkuum
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luoikkuuh
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luáikkoo
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: luáikkojeen
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luoikkuuvettee
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luoikkuv
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luoikkup
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luoikkuuvetteđ
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luáikkojeh

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luáikkojim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luáikkojih
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luoikkui
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luoikkuim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luoikkuid
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luoikkuin
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luoikkuim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luoikkuid
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luáikkojii

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: luoikkuuččim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: luoikkuuččih
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: luoikkuuččij
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: luoikkuuččáim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: luoikkuuččáid
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: luoikkuuččáin
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: luoikkuuččijm
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: luoikkuuččijd
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: luoikkuuččii

#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: luoikkuužeem
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: luoikkuužeeh
##    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: luoikkuš
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: luoikkuužeen
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: luoikkušvettee
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: luoikkuužává
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: luoikkuužep
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: luoikkušvetteđ
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: luoikkuužeh

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luoikkuu
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luoikkum
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: luoikkuuččii
#    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: luoikkuužii
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [luáikkojeijee, luáikkojijjee]
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: luoikkum
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: luoikkum
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: luoikkuumin
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: luoikkuumist
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: luoikkuumân
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: luoikkuudijn
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: luoikkuuhánnáá

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoihâdâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luoihâdah
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luoihâd
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: luoihâdeen
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luoihâdvettee
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luoihâdává
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luoihâdeh

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luoihâd

    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luoihâdim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luoihâdij
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luoihâdii
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: luoihâdiččim
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: luoihâdičij
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: luoihâdižžeem
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: luoihâdiš
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luoihâd
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luoihâdâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: luoihâdižžii
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: luoihâdâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: luoihâdhánnáá
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: luoihâdem
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: luoihâdmân
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: luoihâdmin
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: luoihâdmist
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: luoihâddijn
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: luoihâddijnân
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: luoihâddijnâd
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: luoihâddijnis
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: luoihâddijn
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoihâstâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoihâttâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoihâškuáđám
